test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-complex_kene_gt-norm.yaml
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Par: missuguseid
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [missugustesse, missuguseisse]
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [missugustes, missuguseis]
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [missugustest, missuguseist]
     missugune+Pron+Pl+All: [missugustele, missuguseile]
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [missugustel, missuguseil]
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [missugustelt, missuguseilt]
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [missugusteks, missuguseiks]
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: missugusteni
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: missugustena
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: missugusteta
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Com: missugustega
     #
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: milletaoline
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: milletaolise
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: milletaolist
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [milletaolisesse, milletaolisse]
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: milletaolises
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: milletaolisest
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+All: milletaolisele
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: milletaolisel
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: milletaoliselt
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: milletaoliseks
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: milletaoliseni
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: milletaolisena
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: milletaoliseta
     milletaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: milletaolisega
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: milletaolised
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: milletaoliste
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [milletaoliseid, milletaolisi]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [milletaolistesse, milletaolisisse]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [milletaolistes, milletaolisis]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [milletaolistest, milletaolisist]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [milletaolistele, milletaolisile]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [milletaolistel, milletaolisil]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [milletaolistelt, milletaolisilt]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [milletaolisteks, milletaolisiks]
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: milletaolisteni
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: milletaolistena
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: milletaolisteta
     milletaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: milletaolistega
     #
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: igasugune
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: igasuguse
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Par: igasugust
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: igasugusesse
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: igasuguses
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: igasugusest
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+All: igasugusele
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: igasugusel
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: igasuguselt
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: igasuguseks
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: igasuguseni
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: igasugusena
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: igasuguseta
     igasugune+Pron+Sg+Com: igasugusega
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: igasugused
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: igasuguste
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Par: igasuguseid
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [igasugustesse, igasuguseisse]
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [igasugustes, igasuguseis]
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [igasugustest, igasuguseist]
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+All: [igasugustele, igasuguseile]
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [igasugustel, igasuguseil]
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [igasugustelt, igasuguseilt]
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [igasugusteks, igasuguseiks]
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: igasugusteni
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: igasugustena
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: igasugusteta
     igasugune+Pron+Pl+Com: igasugustega
     #
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: miskisugune
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: miskisuguse
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Par: miskisugust
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: miskisugusesse
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: miskisuguses
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: miskisugusest
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+All: miskisugusele
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: miskisugusel
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: miskisuguselt
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: miskisuguseks
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: miskisuguseni
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: miskisugusena
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: miskisuguseta
     miskisugune+Pron+Sg+Com: miskisugusega
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: miskisugused
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: miskisuguste
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Par: miskisuguseid
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [miskisugustesse, miskisuguseisse]
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [miskisugustes, miskisuguseis]
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [miskisugustest, miskisuguseist]
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+All: [miskisugustele, miskisuguseile]
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [miskisugustel, miskisuguseil]
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [miskisugustelt, miskisuguseilt]
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [miskisugusteks, miskisuguseiks]
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: miskisugusteni
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: miskisugustena
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: miskisugusteta
     miskisugune+Pron+Pl+Com: miskisugustega
     #
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: mitmesugune
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: mitmesuguse
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Par: mitmesugust
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: mitmesugusesse
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: mitmesuguses
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: mitmesugusest
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+All: mitmesugusele
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: mitmesugusel
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: mitmesuguselt
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: mitmesuguseks
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: mitmesuguseni
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: mitmesugusena
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: mitmesuguseta
     mitmesugune+Pron+Sg+Com: mitmesugusega
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: mitmesugused
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: mitmesuguste
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Par: mitmesuguseid
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mitmesugustesse, mitmesuguseisse]
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mitmesugustes, mitmesuguseis]
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mitmesugustest, mitmesuguseist]
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+All: [mitmesugustele, mitmesuguseile]
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mitmesugustel, mitmesuguseil]
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mitmesugustelt, mitmesuguseilt]
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mitmesugusteks, mitmesuguseiks]
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: mitmesugusteni
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: mitmesugustena
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: mitmesugusteta
     mitmesugune+Pron+Pl+Com: mitmesugustega
     #
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: mõnesugune
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: mõnesuguse
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Par: mõnesugust
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: mõnesugusesse
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: mõnesuguses
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: mõnesugusest
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+All: mõnesugusele
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: mõnesugusel
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: mõnesuguselt
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: mõnesuguseks
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: mõnesuguseni
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: mõnesugusena
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: mõnesuguseta
     mõnesugune+Pron+Sg+Com: mõnesugusega
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: mõnesugused
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: mõnesuguste
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Par: mõnesuguseid
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mõnesugustesse, mõnesuguseisse]
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mõnesugustes, mõnesuguseis]
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mõnesugustest, mõnesuguseist]
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+All: [mõnesugustele, mõnesuguseile]
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mõnesugustel, mõnesuguseil]
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mõnesugustelt, mõnesuguseilt]
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mõnesugusteks, mõnesuguseiks]
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: mõnesugusteni
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: mõnesugustena
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: mõnesugusteta
     mõnesugune+Pron+Pl+Com: mõnesugustega
     #
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: naasugune
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: naasuguse
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Par: naasugust
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: naasugusesse
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: naasuguses
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: naasugusest
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+All: naasugusele
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: naasugusel
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: naasuguselt
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: naasuguseks
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: naasuguseni
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: naasugusena
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: naasuguseta
     naasugune+Pron+Sg+Com: naasugusega
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: naasugused
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: naasuguste
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Par: naasuguseid
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [naasugustesse, naasuguseisse]
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [naasugustes, naasuguseis]
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [naasugustest, naasuguseist]
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+All: [naasugustele, naasuguseile]
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [naasugustel, naasuguseil]
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [naasugustelt, naasuguseilt]
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [naasugusteks, naasuguseiks]
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: naasugusteni
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: naasugustena
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: naasugusteta
     naasugune+Pron+Pl+Com: naasugustega
     #
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: omasugune
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: omasuguse
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Par: omasugust
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: omasugusesse
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: omasuguses
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: omasugusest
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+All: omasugusele
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: omasugusel
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: omasuguselt
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: omasuguseks
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: omasuguseni
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: omasugusena
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: omasuguseta
     omasugune+Pron+Sg+Com: omasugusega
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: omasugused
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: omasuguste
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Par: omasuguseid
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [omasugustesse, omasuguseisse]
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [omasugustes, omasuguseis]
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [omasugustest, omasuguseist]
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+All: [omasugustele, omasuguseile]
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [omasugustel, omasuguseil]
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [omasugustelt, omasuguseilt]
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [omasugusteks, omasuguseiks]
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: omasugusteni
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: omasugustena
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: omasugusteta
     omasugune+Pron+Pl+Com: omasugustega
     #
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: omataoline
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: omataolise
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Par: omataolist
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [omataolisesse, omataolisse]
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: omataolises
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: omataolisest
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+All: omataolisele
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: omataolisel
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: omataoliselt
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: omataoliseks
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: omataoliseni
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: omataolisena
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: omataoliseta
     omataoline+Pron+Sg+Com: omataolisega
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: omataolised
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: omataoliste
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [omataoliseid, omataolisi]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [omataolistesse, omataolisisse]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [omataolistes, omataolisis]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [omataolistest, omataolisist]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+All: [omataolistele, omataolisile]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [omataolistel, omataolisil]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [omataolistelt, omataolisilt]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [omataolisteks, omataolisiks]
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: omataolisteni
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: omataolistena
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: omataolisteta
     omataoline+Pron+Pl+Com: omataolistega
     #
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: mitmetaoline
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: mitmetaolise
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: mitmetaolist
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mitmetaolisesse, mitmetaolisse]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: mitmetaolises
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: mitmetaolisest
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+All: mitmetaolisele
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: mitmetaolisel
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: mitmetaoliselt
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: mitmetaoliseks
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: mitmetaoliseni
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: mitmetaolisena
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: mitmetaoliseta
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: mitmetaolisega
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: mitmetaolised
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: mitmetaoliste
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [mitmetaoliseid, mitmetaolisi]
